Missouri, session 2026, HB2978.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.068, to read as follows:
160.068. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Digital instruction", lessons, assignments, testing, or activities delivered
through instructional technology;
(2) "Instructional technology", a laptop, tablet, computer, Chromebook, smart
device, software platform, or other similar device or platform used for student learning;
(3) "Manipulatives", hands-on physical learning items including, but not limited
to, blocks, counters, cubes, rulers, cards, science materials, and similar educational
tools;
(4) "Traditional materials", printed books, paper-based workbooks, notebooks,
handwriting materials, and physical educational resources.
2. (1) Digital instruction for elementary school students in kindergarten through
grade five shall not exceed forty-five minutes per student per instructional day, inclusive
of all subjects.
(2) Instructional technology shall not replace primary instruction in:
(a) Reading and literacy;
(b) Foundational mathematics;
(c) Handwriting or cursive writing;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2978 2
(d) Science lessons requiring physical demonstration or manipulatives; and
(e) Social studies content knowledge.
(3) At least seventy percent of student assignments for elementary school
students in kindergarten through grade five shall be completed using pen or pencil and
paper including, but not limited to, dedicated handwriting practice and cursive writing
tasks for students in grade two through grade five.
(4) Each elementary school student in kindergarten through grade five shall
have daily access to printed books and printed reading materials. No elementary school
shall rely exclusively on digital textbooks or digital reading platforms for elementary
literacy instruction.
(5) Elementary school classrooms shall incorporate physical manipulatives in
core mathematics and science instruction for all elementary school students in
kindergarten through grade five.
3. (1) Beginning in grade two, all elementary schools shall provide explicit,
systematic instruction in cursive handwriting including, but not limited to, letter
formation, connecting strokes, and fluency.
(2) Instruction shall be aligned with current research showing that:
(a) Cursive activates neural circuits used for letter recognition, decoding, and
orthographic mapping, all of which strengthens reading ability;
(b) Students retain and comprehend more when writing by hand due to
activation of visual-motor memory centers;
(c) The continuous strokes of cursive writing improve reading fluency, spelling
accuracy, and long-term retention;
(d) Cursive instruction improves phonological awareness and reinforces letter
sequencing; and
(e) Students with dyslexia benefit from cursive through reduced letter reversals,
improved letter-shape stability, and enhanced decoding pathways.
(3) Elementary school students shall be able to read and write legible cursive by
the end of grade five.
(4) Cursive instruction shall not be replaced with stylus-based digital
handwriting, typing programs, or tablet simulations.
4. For elementary school students in kindergarten through grade five,
technology may be used for the following purposes, which shall not count toward the
daily cap under subsection 2 of this section:
(1) Special-education needs documented in an individualized education
program, or IEP, as such term is defined in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended, or a

HB 2978 3
504 plan created under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.
Section 794, as amended;
(2) Assistive or adaptive technology required for student access; and
(3) Teacher-directed demonstrations on a projector or smartboard, provided
students are not individually using devices.
5. For elementary school students in kindergarten through grade five,
elementary schools shall not:
(1) Assign required homework that requires the use of instructional technology;
(2) Require elementary school students in kindergarten through grade five to
carry devices to and from school daily;
(3) Use technology for classroom management, behavioral tracking, or
entertainment;
(4) Replace library time with digital reading labs; or
(5) Substitute cursive handwriting instruction with digital handwriting or typing
programs.
6. (1) For elementary school students in kindergarten through grade five, each
school district shall adopt a written technology-use policy consistent with this section
and that establishes requirements for the following:
(a) The school's daily screen-time limits;
(b) A list of digital platforms used;
(c) Notice of a parent's or guardian's right to request additional screen-time
reductions for their child; and
(d) A description of the school's handwriting and cursive instruction plan.
(2) Each elementary school shall notify parents and guardians annually of the
items listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
7. For elementary school students in kindergarten through grade five, each
school district shall annually report:
(1) Average daily student device-use minutes by grade;
(2) A list of software and digital platforms used by elementary school students in
kindergarten through grade five;
(3) Verification that printed textbooks and physical manipulatives are provided;
and
(4) Verification of compliance with cursive instruction requirements including,
but not limited to, minutes of instruction and proficiency benchmarks.
8. (1) Each elementary school shall adopt a written policy governing the
requirements of this section.

HB 2978 4
(2) Such elementary school shall develop and design such policy to promote the
educational interests of students and to ensure that technology supports, rather than
supplants, foundational learning and to restore evidence-based practices of handwriting
and cursive writing that improve literacy.
(3) Each elementary school shall publish such policy on such school's website.
9. This section shall apply for the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school
years.
✔